Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1741
Safety deposit box service.

(1) A credit union, by action of its board of directors, may, to the same extent as a bank organized under the laws of this state, operate a safety deposit box service for its members pursuant to sections 8-501 and 8-502.

(2) Before granting approval for a credit union to operate a safety deposit box service, the director shall consider the reserve position of the credit union, the performance qualifications of its management, the rules of the credit union for the operation of its safety deposit box service, security measures, bonding and insurance, and the general safe and sound condition of the credit union.

(3) A credit union shall not spend more than twenty-five thousand dollars or an amount equal to one percent of its capital, whichever is greater, on the capital expenditures of its safety deposit box service.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 41;

Laws 1997, LB 137, § 14.